morphology/spellcheckUnificado_foma_new/spanishSpellcheck.foma
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu (might otherwise be confused with -pa repetitive) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2 .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       #define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SIu" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];

	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  {si}"@SI" => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  {mi}"@MI" => Cons _  ];

	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];

       #define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;
	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2 .o. CHA3;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               DERIVATION BOUNDARIES                                ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################


      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # 1. special case: last verbal IG: DB before aspect, tense, if present, else before person suffix  #
      # 2. special case: last IG as-suffixes, DB before slot 6 if present, else slot 7                   #
      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define IGverb1  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || "+Prog"%] _  ?* [%["Tns"%]|%["VPers"%]] ];
      define IGverb2  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+NPst"|"+IPst"|"+Prog"]%] _  ?* %["VPers" ];
      define IGas1     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+Top"|"+QTop"|"+Dub"]%] _  ];
      define IGas2     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"] _  ];
define IGRules IGverb1 .o. IGverb2 .o. IGas1 .o. IGas2;


#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      source  as-1.foma
      source  as-2.foma
      source  as-3.foma
      source  as-4.foma
      source  as-5.foma
      source  as-6.foma
      source  as-7.foma
      define HonAff [ {lla}  "+Lim_Aff" ] : {lla} ;

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] .o. UpperCase;


####################################################################################


       ###########################
       #                         #
       # ADVERBS & CONJUNCTIONS  #
       #                         #
       ###########################
      
      define ADVERBS @re"spanish-adverbs.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
      define CONJUNCTIONS @re"spanish-conj.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
      define PREPOSITIONS @re"spanish-prep.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;

######################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########
      
      define VROOT @re"spanish-verbs.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;

       source v-v-1-guesser.foma
       source v-v-2.foma
       source v-v-3.foma
       source v-v-4.foma
       source  v-v-5.foma
       source  v-v-6-norm.foma
       source v-v-7.foma

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [(HonAff) V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7) (AS)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. UpperCase .o. QuechuaOrtho ;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

      define NROOT1 @re"spanish-nouns1.regex" .o. SpanOrtho; #a-f
      define NROOT2 @re"spanish-nouns2.regex" .o. SpanOrtho; #g-z
      define NROOT [NROOT1|NROOT2];

       source n-n-1-guesser.foma
       source  n-n-2.foma
       source  n-n-3.foma
       #nominal transitive forms
       source  npers.foma 
       source n-n-4.foma
       source  n-n-5.foma
       source  n-n-6.foma
       source  n-n-7.foma
       define kamaDist [  {kama} "+Dist" ] : {kama};
       

      define NounSuffixes PossessivPlural .o. [(N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho .o. UpperCase;
     #  define NounSuffixes PossessivPlural .o. [(N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff)  (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (HonAff) (AS)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho .o. UpperCase;
     
######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################


       define NtoV @re"n-v-guesser.regex" ;
       define VtoN DB @re"v-n.regex" ; #mit diesen Suffixen nominalisierte Verben können nicht wieder verbalisiert werden
       define VtoNfinal DB @re"v-n-final.regex" ;
       define VtoNfinalTrans DB @re"v-n-transitive.regex" ;
       define Relational [ "[" "--" "]" {n} "[" "NDeriv" "]" "[" "+Rel" "]" ] : {n};
       define VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS  VerbRulesUpper .o. [V=V=1^{0,3} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4) (HonAff)] .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho .o.UpperCase;

       #------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs:     #
       # VRoot + VtoN = NDeriv1 #
       # "taki-qti", "taki-y"   #
       #------------------------#
       define NDeriv1 [VROOT  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];
       define NDeriv1final [VROOT  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];
       define NDeriv1finalTrans [VROOT [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinalTrans] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized nouns:          #
       # NRoot + NtoV = VDeriv1     #
       # "wasi-n-cha-", "hatun-ya-" #
       # NtoV: -ykacha/kacha as     #
       # verbalizing suffix         #
       #----------------------------#
       define VDeriv1 [NROOT (Relational) (HonAff) NtoV];

       #--------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb Nr.2:         #
       # NRoot + NtoV + VtoN = NDeriv2  #
       # "wasi-n-cha-y", "hatun-ya-sqa" #
       #--------------------------------#
       define NDeriv2 [VDeriv1  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN ] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];
       define NDeriv2final [VDeriv1  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];

       #--------------------------------#
       # verbalized noun Nr.2:          #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV = VDeriv1  #
       # "yaku-naya-q"                  #
       #--------------------------------#
       define VDeriv2 [NDeriv1 NtoV];

       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs Nr.3:             #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV +VtoN = NDeriv3 #
       # "yuya-y-cha-ku-y"                   #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv3 [VDeriv2  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];
       define NDeriv3final [VDeriv2  [ [VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal] .o. QuechuaOrtho ] ];

#define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv1final|NDeriv2|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3|NDeriv3final];
define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv2|NDeriv3];
define NDERIVFINAL [NDeriv1final|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3final];
define VDERIV [VDeriv1|VDeriv2];


#define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3)  (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7) (AS)] ;
define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3) (AS)] ;
define NounConverbTrans watrans .o. sutrans .o. [[NDeriv1finalTrans] (HonAff) npers (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounNormal  [[NROOT|NDERIV] NounSuffixes] ;
define Noun [NounConverb|NounNormal|NounConverbTrans];
define Verb  [[VROOT|VDERIV] VerbSuffixes];


#########################################################################
#########################################################################

       
       #########################
       #                       #
       # FEATURE RESTRICTIONS  #
       #                       #
       #########################

# naya/sun,  -sun -> 1.Pl.Incl.Fut/Imp, but not 2.Obj,3.Subj
define NAYASUN [~$["+Obl"%] %["--"%] {ya} %["VS"%] %["+Trs" | "+Reub"%] %["--"%] {ya} %["VS"%] %["+Trs" | "+Reub"%] %["--"%] {ya} %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff" | "+2.Obj"?*"+3.Sg.Subj" | "+Aug"%] %["^DB"%] %["--"%] [n|m] %[["NPers"|"Amb"] ]] ; 

# case suffixes:  tapi, pita, manta, tamanta, mantaq, ntin, paq, tata (false double accusatives: contratatan -> not contra-ta-ta!)
define CASE [~$["+Acc"?*"+Loc" | "+Loc"?*"+Acc" | "+Dat_Ill"?*"+Acc" | "+Acc"?*"+Abl" | "+Abl"?*"+Gen" | {ntin}%["Cas"%] %["+Iclsv"%] %["^DB"%] %["--"%] [n|m] %[ | {pa}%["Cas"%] %["+Gen"%] ?* "@GENq" |"+Acc" ?* "+Acc" | "@GENq" ?* "@TA"]];

# verbal derivation, nyari, qti,  sqama, sqan, rqan (sqas ?), sqay, sqaman, sqa+fut, sqaykiman, rqa/sqa-Imp
define VERBMORPHS [~$["+Cont"?*"+Inch" | "+Ag"?*"+Char" | "+3.Sg.Subj.IPst"?*"+DirE_Emph" | "+3.Sg.Subj.IPst"?*"+DirE" | "+3.Sg.Subj.NPst"%] %["^DB"%] %["--"%][n|m]%["Amb"  | ["+IPst"|"+3.Sg.Subj.IPst"]?*["+1.Sg.Subj.Pot"|"+Pot"] | ["+IPst"|"Tns_VPers"]?*["+3.Sg.Subj.Fut"] | "+1.Sg.Subj_2.Sg.Obj.Fut"?*"+Pot" | ["Tns"|"VPers_Tns"] ?* "@IMP" ]];

# verbal derivation 2: paku, pamu, yman, ykacha, yuq, saq (#saq, if -sa is allowed as progressive allomorph (Bolivian Quechua) TODO: allow and disambiguate later??), ptin (#-pti -> Ayacuchano, but -n as DirE, only Cuzqueño), stin (-stin, not as -sti -n (3.Sg.Subj, or DirE))
define VERBMORPHS2  [~$[%["+Rep"%] %["^DB"%] %["--"%]{ku} | "+Rep"%] %["--"%]{mu} | "+2.Sg.Subj.Imp"?*"+Pot" | "+Inf"%] %["--"%] {kacha} %["VS"%] %["+Sml" |"+yu+" %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff"%] "@YKU" %["^DB"%] %["--"%] q %["NS"  | "@SAPROG"?*"+Ag" | {stin}%["NS"%] %["+SS_Sim"%] %["^DB"%] %["--"%] [n|m] | {pti}%["NS"%] %["+DS"%] "@PTI" %["^DB"%] %["--"%] [n|m] %["Amb" ]];

# independent suffixes: pas, taq, niraq
define INDEP [~$[{pa}%["Cas"%] %["+Gen"%] "@PA" %["^DB"%] %["--"%] s %["Amb"%] %["+IndE" | "@TA" ?* "@GENq"| {nira} %["NDeriv"%] ?* "@GENq" | "Part_Disc" ?* "+Disc"  ]] ;
